en: Marsh-mallow tea, Marsh mallow, Common marshmallow
de: Echter Eibisch
fr: Guimauve officinale, Guimauve sauvage, Mauve blanche
hr: Čaj od bijelog sljeza
ja: ウスベニタチアオイ, ビロードアオイ
la: Althaea officinalis
nl: Echte heemst, Heemst

en: Maypop, Purple passionflower, True passionflower
de: Passionsblume
es: Pasiflora
fr: Liane de grenade, Encore maypop
hr: Svibanjski pop
ja: チャボトケイソウ
la: Passiflora incarnata
nl: Passiebloem
pl: Męczennica cielista, Męczennica

en: Midland hawthorn
de: Weißdorn
es: Espino blanco
fr: Aubépine à deux styles, Aubépine lisse
hr: Srednji glog
la: Crataegus oxyacantha
nl: Tweestijlige meidoorn, Meidoorn
pl: Głóg dwuszyjkowy

en: Olive tree products
bg: Маслинени продукти
ca: Productes d'olivera
de: Olivenbaumprodukte
es: Productos del olivo
fi: Oliivipuun tuotteet
fr: Produits de l'olivier
he: מוצרי שמן זית
hr: Proizvodi od maslina
hu: Olajfa termékek, Olívás termékek
it: Prodotti dell'ulivo
la: Olea europaea
lt: Alyvuogių produktai
nl: Olijfboomproducten
pl: Produkty drzewa oliwnego
pt: Produtos de oliveira
ru: Продукты из оливок
zh: 橄榄类制品

en: Olive leaves
de: Olivenblätter
es: Hojas de olivo
fr: Feuilles d'olivier
hr: Listovi masline
hu: Olajfalevél
ja: オリーブの葉
lt: Alyvuogių lapai
nl: Olijfboomblad
pl: Liście oliwki, Liście oliwy

en: Orange blossom
de: Orangenblüte
es: Azahar, Flor de azahar
fr: Fleur d'oranger
hr: Narančin cvijet
hu: Narncsvirág
ja: オレンジの花
lt: Apelsinų žiedai
nl: Oranjebloesem
pl: Kwiat pomarańczy

en: Perforate St John's-wort, Common Saint John's wort, St John's wort
de: Johanniskraut
es: Hipérico, Hierba de San Juan
fr: Millepertuis perforé
hr: Perforirati st john's-wort
la: Hypericum perforatum
nl: Sint-janskruid
pl: Dziurawiec zwyczajny, Dziurawiec

en: Ribwort Plantain, English plantain, Narrowleaf plantain
de: Spitzwegerich
es: Llantén, Llantén menor
fr: Plantain lancéolé, Plantain étroit
hr: Rebrasti trputac
ja: ヘラオオバコ
la: Plantago lanceolata
nl: Smalle weegbree
pl: Babka lancetowata

en: Rooibos, Redbush
xx: Rooibos
de: Rotbusch
es: Rooibos
fi: Rooibos
fr: Rooibos, Infusions au rooibos, Infusion au rooibos, Thé rooibos
hr: Rooibos
hu: Rooibos, Rooibos tea
it: Rooibos
ja: ルイボス
la: Aspalathus linearis
nl: Rooibos
pl: Rooibos, Czerwonokrzew

en: Rooibos mixes
nl: Rooibos melanges

en: Rose hip
da: Hyben
de: Hagebutte
es: Escaramujo
fr: Cynorrhodon
hr: Šipak
la: Rosa Canina
nb: Nyper
nl: Rozebottel
nn: Nyper
pl: Owoc róży, Owoce róży
sv: Nypon

en: Rough bindweed, Common smilax, Sarsaparille
de: Stechwinde, Sarsaparilla
es: Zarzaparrilla
fr: Salsepareille
hr: Hrapavi vijenac
la: Smilax regelii, Smilax aspera
nl: Sarsaparilla
pl: Kolcorośl szorstki

en: Liquorice roots, licorice roots
fr: Bâtons de réglisse, bâton de réglisse
hr: Korijenje sladića
lt: Saldymedžio šaknys
pl: Korzenie lukrecji, Korzeń lukrecji

en: Sugarcanes, Sugar canes
fr: Cannes à sucre

en: Psyllium
fr: Psyllium
hr: Psilij
nl: Psylliumvezels

en: Stevia and their products, Stevia
bg: Стевия
de: Stevia
es: Estevia y sus derivados, Estevia, Stevia
fi: stevia ja steviasta valmistetut tuotteet
fr: Stévia et dérivés, Stévia
hr: Stevia i njihovi proizvodi
hu: Stevia alapú termékek, Stevia, Jázminpakóca
it: Stevia e derivati
ja: サイリウム
la: Stevia rebaudiana
lt: Stevia ir jų produktai, Stevia
nl: Stevia
pl: Stewia i jej produkty, Stewia

en: Stevia leaves
de: Steviablätter
es: Hojas de estevia
fr: Feuilles de stévia
hr: Listovi stevije
hu: Stevialevél
ja: ステビアの葉
nl: Steviabladeren, Steviablad
pl: Liście stewii

en: Fresh stevia, Fresh stevia leaves
de: Frische Steviablätter
es: Estevia fresca, Hojas de estevia fresca
fr: Stévia fraîche, Feuilles de stévia fraîche
hr: Svježa stevija
nl: Verse steviabladeren, Verse steviablad
pl: Świeże liście stewii

en: Ground dried stevia, Ground dried stevia leaves
de: Gemahlene Steviablätter
es: Estevia seca molida, Hojas de estevia seca molida
fr: Stévia sèche moulu, Feuilles de stévia sèche moulue
hr: Samljevena sušena stevija
nl: Gedroogde steviabladeren, Gedroogde steviablad

en: Potted stevia
de: Steviapflanze
es: Macetas de estevia
fr: Stévia en pot
hr: Stevia u saksiji
nl: Steviaplant